Utah statutes.
31A-22-201.   Required provisions of liability insurance policies.
Every liability insurance policy shall provide that the bankruptcy or
insolvency of the insured may not diminish any liability of the insurer to
third parties, and that if execution against the insured is returned
unsatisfied, an action may be maintained against the insurer to the extent
that the liability is covered by the policy.
